Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 9
CONVERSIONS AND MERGERS

7-64-901 to 7-64-909. (Repealed)

Editor's note:

(1) This article was added in 1997, and this part 9 was subsequently repealed in 2003, effective July 1, 2004. For amendments to this part 9 prior to its repeal in 2004, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.

(2) Section 7-64-909 provided for the repeal of this part 9, effective July 1, 2004. (See L. 2003, pp. 2356, 2357.)